Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB780.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 382.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All deeds, mortgages, and other instruments required by law to be recorded to be
effectual against purchasers without notice, or creditors, shall be recorded in the
county clerk's office of the county in which the property conveyed, or the greater
part of the property conveyed[thereof], is located.
(2) No county clerk or deputy county clerk shall admit to record any deed of
conveyance of any interest in real property equal to or greater than a life estate,
unless the deed plainly specifies and refers to the immediate source from which the
grantor derived title to the property or the interest conveyed in the deed[therein].
(3) (a) An authentic photocopy of any original record may be certified[,] as a true,
complete, unaltered copy of the original record on file by the official public
custodian of the record.
(b) A certified copy of a document[ certified by the official public custodian of
that document] may be submitted for filing in any other filing officer's
jurisdiction as though it were the original record. However, no county clerk or
deputy county clerk shall accept for filing any original document or certified
copy of any document unless the original document and its certified copy
conform[conforms] to all statutory requirements for filing the document
under KRS Chapter 382.[ The provisions of ]
(c) This subsection shall apply only to a record generated and filed in Kentucky,
and only if the certified copy of the record[thereof] is to be utilized in
Kentucky. If the record is a foreign record or a Kentucky record to be filed or
utilized in a foreign jurisdiction, then this subsection shall not apply and
applicable federal, Kentucky, or foreign law shall apply.
(4) If the source of title is a deed or other recorded writing, the deed offered for record
Page 1 of 3
BR194000.100 - 1940 - XXXX 3/18/2026 2:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1940
shall refer to the former deed or writing, and give the office, book, and page where
recorded, and the date of recording[thereof]. If the property or interest in the
property[therein] is obtained by inheritance or in any other way than by recorded
instrument of writing, the deed offered for record shall state clearly and accurately
how and from whom the title to the property or interest[thereto] was obtained by
the grantor.
(5) If the title to the property or interest conveyed is obtained from two (2) or more
sources, the deed offered for record shall plainly specify and refer to each of the
sources in the manner provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, and shall
show which part of the property, or interest in the property[therein], was obtained
from each of the sources.
(6) No grantor shall lodge for record, and no county clerk or deputy shall receive and
permit to be lodged for record, any deed that does not comply with[ the provisions
of] this section.
(7) No clerk or deputy clerk shall be liable for[to] the fine imposed by subsection (1) of
KRS 382.990 because of any erroneous or false references in any[ such] deed, nor
because of the omission of a reference required by law where it does not appear on
the face of the[such] deed that the title to the property or interest conveyed was
obtained from more than one (1) source.
(8) This section does not apply to deeds made by any court commissioner, sheriff, or by
any[ officer of] court officer in pursuance of his or her duty as a court[such]
officer, nor to any deed or instrument made and acknowledged before March 20,
1928. No deed shall be invalid because it is lodged contrary to[ the provisions of]
this section.
(9) A mortgage holder shall file a deed in lieu of foreclosure in the county clerk's office
of the county in which the property conveyed, or the greater part of the property
conveyed[thereof], is located, no later than forty-five (45) days after the date the
Page 2 of 3
BR194000.100 - 1940 - XXXX 3/18/2026 2:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1940
deed in lieu of foreclosure is executed.
(10) (a) A deed filed pursuant to KRS 426.577 shall be filed by the grantee within five
(5) business days of receipt of the deed from the commissioner appointed by a
court to convey the property.
(b) If the property is located within the boundaries of a municipal government
and the grantee has not filed the deed from the commissioner within thirty
(30) business days of its receipt, the municipal government may file a
petition in the Circuit Court of the county where the property is located
requesting the court to enter an order:
1. Compelling the filing of the deed by the grantee;
2. Awarding court costs and attorney's fees incurred in bringing the
action;
3. Imposing any fines or penalties as determined by the court; and
4. Awarding any other proper relief to which the municipal government
may be entitled.
Page 3 of 3
BR194000.100 - 1940 - XXXX 3/18/2026 2:32 PM Jacketed